
 
https://hmrlabs.com
HMR Labs - Independent Pharmaceutical Testing Skip to content Herd Mundy
Richardson Limited +44 (0) 161 406 6767 info@hmrlabs.com Testing Services
Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient Method
Development and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us
News Contact Us Welcome to HMR Labs HMR Labs is a highly professional,
independent provider of contract analytical and pharmaceutical testing
services. ﻿ Contact Us Services ADVANCED, INNOVATIVE PARTNER Supporting the
development of the next generation of therapeutics through delivery of
advanced pharmaceutical testing, state-of-the-art instrumentation, novel
method development and tailored testing capabilities at HMR Labs. BESPOKE
TESTING Unique pharmaceutical testing is essential for facilitating the growth
and expansion of the healthcare market with novel, innovative and comparator
drug candidates. Enabling access to the most preferred pharmaceutical
products. FLEXIBLE TESTING CAPABILITIES HMR Labs offers flexibility where you
need it, whether it’s testing timeframes, customised protocols, R&D support,
method development or diversity in drug compounds. Our approach delivers what
you need, when you need it. VALUE ADD PROVIDER HMR Labs’ comprehensive testing
range is accompanied by product development support, quality improvement
initiatives, GMP and regulatory compliance, project collaboration, QA/QC
consultancy and over 35 years of expertise. Services We Provide HMR Labs
specialise in cGMP-compliant analytical services. We are a market-leading
pharmaceutical and analytical contract testing provider focused on delivering
a time-efficient, client-centred approach. With dedicated teams of analytical
scientists that perform a comprehensive range of testing, we pride ourselves
on delivering services that go beyond a standard contract testing provider.
All our testing programs can be customised and delivered in a timeframe that
suits you. We’re here to help you navigate regulatory approval of the
following testing services: STABILITY TESTING INHALED PRODUCT TESTING FINISHED
PRODUCT TESTING MICROBIOLOGICAL TESTING METHOD DEVELOPMENT AND VALIDATION
PHARMACEUTICAL INGREDIENT TESTING VIEW SERVICES Latest News ICH Stability
Testing and appropriate validation of analytical procedures Regardless of
whether you’re at the pharmaceutical manufacturing stage, the biotechnology
research and development stage, or the drug discovery lead generation stage of
the drug candidate lifecycle, ICH guidelines play[…] Read more Revolutionising
respiratory health: inhalation drug product testing It’s estimated that around
545 million individuals worldwide live with chronic respiratory conditions.
Given its prevalence, inhalation therapeutics are an integral focus within the
R&D realm to evolve treatments. With[…] Read more Behind the Scenes: Unveiling
the essential role of finished product testing Pharmaceutical innovation is
one of the main driving forces behind healthcare advances. Piloting new and
enhanced treatments has accelerated public health to never-before-seen
heights. From drug discovery and development to[…] Read more SEE ALL NEWS
Contact Us Contact us today to discuss your specific test requirements
directly with our team of analytical scientists. HMR Labs © HMR Labs 2021
Testing Services Bespoke Projects Our Labs About Us News Contact Us Testing
Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient
Method Development and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation
About Us News Contact Us


 
https://hmrlabs.com/
HMR Labs - Independent Pharmaceutical Testing Skip to content Herd Mundy
Richardson Limited +44 (0) 161 406 6767 info@hmrlabs.com Testing Services
Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient Method
Development and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us
News Contact Us Welcome to HMR Labs HMR Labs is a highly professional,
independent provider of contract analytical and pharmaceutical testing
services. ﻿ Contact Us Services ADVANCED, INNOVATIVE PARTNER Supporting the
development of the next generation of therapeutics through delivery of
advanced pharmaceutical testing, state-of-the-art instrumentation, novel
method development and tailored testing capabilities at HMR Labs. BESPOKE
TESTING Unique pharmaceutical testing is essential for facilitating the growth
and expansion of the healthcare market with novel, innovative and comparator
drug candidates. Enabling access to the most preferred pharmaceutical
products. FLEXIBLE TESTING CAPABILITIES HMR Labs offers flexibility where you
need it, whether it’s testing timeframes, customised protocols, R&D support,
method development or diversity in drug compounds. Our approach delivers what
you need, when you need it. VALUE ADD PROVIDER HMR Labs’ comprehensive testing
range is accompanied by product development support, quality improvement
initiatives, GMP and regulatory compliance, project collaboration, QA/QC
consultancy and over 35 years of expertise. Services We Provide HMR Labs
specialise in cGMP-compliant analytical services. We are a market-leading
pharmaceutical and analytical contract testing provider focused on delivering
a time-efficient, client-centred approach. With dedicated teams of analytical
scientists that perform a comprehensive range of testing, we pride ourselves
on delivering services that go beyond a standard contract testing provider.
All our testing programs can be customised and delivered in a timeframe that
suits you. We’re here to help you navigate regulatory approval of the
following testing services: STABILITY TESTING INHALED PRODUCT TESTING FINISHED
PRODUCT TESTING MICROBIOLOGICAL TESTING METHOD DEVELOPMENT AND VALIDATION
PHARMACEUTICAL INGREDIENT TESTING VIEW SERVICES Latest News ICH Stability
Testing and appropriate validation of analytical procedures Regardless of
whether you’re at the pharmaceutical manufacturing stage, the biotechnology
research and development stage, or the drug discovery lead generation stage of
the drug candidate lifecycle, ICH guidelines play[…] Read more Revolutionising
respiratory health: inhalation drug product testing It’s estimated that around
545 million individuals worldwide live with chronic respiratory conditions.
Given its prevalence, inhalation therapeutics are an integral focus within the
R&D realm to evolve treatments. With[…] Read more Behind the Scenes: Unveiling
the essential role of finished product testing Pharmaceutical innovation is
one of the main driving forces behind healthcare advances. Piloting new and
enhanced treatments has accelerated public health to never-before-seen
heights. From drug discovery and development to[…] Read more SEE ALL NEWS
Contact Us Contact us today to discuss your specific test requirements
directly with our team of analytical scientists. HMR Labs © HMR Labs 2021
Testing Services Bespoke Projects Our Labs About Us News Contact Us Testing
Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient
Method Development and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation
About Us News Contact Us


 
https://hmrlabs.com/pharmaceutical-analytical-testing-services/
Pharmaceutical Analytical Testing Services - HMR Labs Skip to content Herd
Mundy Richardson Limited +44 (0) 161 406 6767 info@hmrlabs.com Testing
Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient
Method Development and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation
About Us News Contact Us Pharmaceutical Analytical Testing Services Whether
you’re a pharmaceutical manufacturer or research organisation, our specialist,
compliant, pharmaceutical analytical testing services are designed to provide
you with the reliable data necessary to make informed decisions and bring high
quality pharmaceutical products to market. Outsourcing pharmaceutical
analytical testing to HMR Labs can provide SME’s with the opportunity to
access specific expertise and advanced technology. Meanwhile, larger
organisations can take advantage of our 35+ years of experience, which assists
in the requirement for specialised, ad-hoc and consultative testing. Our
comprehensive pharmaceutical testing portfolio is flexible, customisable and
compliant with the latest ICH guidelines and regulatory protocols. Choose a
partnership with HMR Labs and we’ll execute dynamic testing projects that
align with development needs, regulatory requirements or resource constraints.
Purpose Built Pharmaceutical Analytical Laboratories HMR Labs partners with
its customers to provide access to the latest advancements in analytical
technology, delivering reliable and compliant pharmaceutical test methods. Our
skilled scientists excel in method development and validation for a range of
products, regardless of dosage form. Whether your products are solid dose, dry
powders or soft mist inhalers, suspensions, solutions or another formulation.
We will work with you from initial contact to result delivery, always ensuring
full communication. We’re passionate about delivering a highly sought after,
collaborative project management style. Have a question? No problem, you’re
always able to speak to the scientist working on your products. HMR Labs are
dedicated to being a smooth, hassle-free outsourced partner during your batch
release journey. All Pharmaceutical and Analytical Testing Services Tailor any
of our pharmaceutical testing services to suit your specific needs:
PHARMACEUTICAL FINISHED PRODUCT TESTING We perform routine finished product
testing for the release of products into various markets, in-process and
comparator testing. INHALATION DRUG PRODUCT TESTING We have a vast range of
state-of-the-art equipment and highly trained analysts to enable the testing
of a range of orally inhaled and nasal drug products (OINDPs) such as metered
dose inhalers (MDIs), dry powder inhalers (DPIs), aqueous mist inhalers,
nebuliser solutions and suspensions and aerosols. ANALYTICAL METHOD
DEVELOPMENT AND VALIDATION Many years of experience enable us to develop and
validate analytical methods for all dose forms to current ICH guidelines. GMP
& PHARMACEUTICAL MICROBIOLOGICAL TESTING A full range of microbiological
services are available, including microbial limits, preservative efficacy,
bacterial endotoxins (LAL), identification of contaminants, bioburden
experiments, environmental testing and evaluation of disinfectants and
biocides. PHARMACEUTICAL STABILITY TESTING & STORAGE We are able to provide a
full ICH stability service from the preparation of protocols, management of
sample storage and pull points, compliant analysis to preparing reports and
trend tables. PHARMACOPEIAL TESTING OF INGREDIENTS HMR Labs has extensive
experience in the pharmacopeial testing (Ph.Eur., BP, USP and JP) on active
pharmaceutical ingredients and excipients. Our fully trained analysts can
deliver a comprehensive compendial testing service briefed according to your
exact requirements. Get in touch with hmr labs Stability Testing and Storage
Services Stability testing and storage is vital for ensuring the long-term
quality, efficacy, and safety of your pharmaceutical products as they enter
the market. HMR Labs offers a full ICH stability service to test new drug
substances, which can involve the preparation of protocols where necessary.
Using standard and customised storage conditions, our proprietary stability
services can deliver the data you need at a timeframe that suits you whilst
remaining ICH compliant. This includes ambient and accelerated environments.
Whether you require the validation of stability-indicating methods, the use of
our stability storage suite and pull point management or specialised lighting,
temperature, and humidity conditions. We can work with you to provide the
data, reports and trend tables which establishes shelf life and meets
regulatory guidance and ICH protocols. VIEW FULL SERVICE Bespoke Projects and
Turnaround Times Manufacturers of innovative drug products often require
uniquely developed and validated testing methodologies for their journey to
the shelves. We understand for many customers, the faster a project is
executed, the better. This is why all of our bespoke projects are conducted at
our specialist, in-house laboratories, offering a versatile and effective
analytical testing service with cost effective pricing and quick turnaround
times. By continuing to invest in advanced instrumentation and housing the
very best analytical technology, HMR Labs can streamline your analytical
projects to meet timeframes which suit your batch release programs. Each
customer project is unique, and our testing and analysis approach is tailored
to delivering bespoke solutions every time. OUR BESPOKE SERVICES OUR INDUSTRY
EXPERTISE Contact Us Contact us today to discuss your specific test
requirements directly with our team of analytical scientists. All Services
Pharmaceutical Stability Testing and Storage gmp and Pharmaceutical
microbiologial testing Pharmaceutical finished product testing Inhalation drug
product testing analytical method development and validation Bespoke
pharmaceutical and analytical services HMR Labs © HMR Labs 2021 Testing
Services Bespoke Projects Our Labs About Us News Contact Us Loading
Comments... Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product
Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation Bespoke Projects
Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us


 
https://hmrlabs.com/pharmaceutical-stability-testing-storage/
Pharmaceutical Stability Testing and Storage - HMR Labs Skip to content Herd
Mundy Richardson Limited +44 (0) 161 406 6767 info@hmrlabs.com Testing
Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient
Method Development and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation
About Us News Contact Us ICH Stability Testing of Pharmaceutical Products Gain
the confidence that products will maintain their quality, safety and efficacy
throughout their intended shelf life with HMR Labs’ pharmaceutical stability
testing. Our stability testing service is comprehensive and designed to
provide you with valuable outsourced solutions that can be tailored to your
exact needs. Whether it’s stability study design, protocol consultancy or
stability storage and pull point management. HMR Labs is able to undertake ICH
stability testing and ICH stability study protocol development, ensuring any
approach is designed so that the shelf life of the product can be determined
with a high degree of accuracy and precision. Through scientific project
managers, our consultative approach ensures that testing and analysis meets
the data demands of shelf-life determination, formulation development, batch
release, quality control, storage and packaging requirements and more. Not to
mention, removing the risk of distributing compromised products to safeguard
patient safety. Let our lab experts assist you in ensuring the success of your
products in the market! GET IN TOUCH WITH HMR LABS IN HOUSE SCIENTISTS ARE
PERSONAL PROJECT MANAGERS STANDARD AND CUSTOMISABLE STORAGE CONDITIONS
AVAILABLE 35+ YEARS OF ICH STABILITY TESTING EXPERIENCE A Comprehensive
Stability Testing Laboratory To ensure optimal market performance, the HMR
Labs team commits itself to delivering insightful data analysis and actionable
recommendations at every testing phase and beyond. Each project and
partnership is enhanced by reporting that meets the highest industry
standards. HMR Labs’ purpose build laboratories house a range of
instrumentation and detector types to ensure our equipment is qualified to
conduct: Real Time and Accelerated Stability Studies HMR Labs work to assist
pharmaceutical manufacturers and research organisations to understand the
chemical, physical and microbiological attributes of their drug compounds,
determining shelf life and degradation pathways. Our stability testing
services strictly adhere to the international regulatory guidelines set by
ICH, the FDA and EMA. These data driven insights are gathered and reported to
our customers in real time to ensure pharmaceutical products meet all
compliance requirements. In situations where time-to-market is critical, our
stability testing laboratory can undertake an accelerated study by exposing
drug candidates to elevated temperature and humidity conditions. Producing
valuable stability predictions of long-term exposure even in shorter time
frames, predictive analytics can provide more than just rapid results. It can
estimate your products behaviour, facilitate accurate projections and plan the
future of new, adapted pharmaceuticals with confidence from robust analytical
data. Forced Degradation and Photodegradation Studies Placing deliberate
stress on pharmaceutical products to gather heat, light, oxidation and pH
related changes uncovers vulnerabilities in novel drug compounds. HMR Labs can
characterise the degradation of pharmaceutical products and use our knowledge
of testing protocols and procedures to equip you with proactive stabilisation
strategies and maintain shelf life integrity. Our stability testing laboratory
also facilitates photodegradation studies for those products that exhibit
light sensitivity. We have invested in the latest technology to ensure the
highest controlled testing environments, helping you quantifiably determine a
developmental drug products’ quality and performance whilst subjected to
varying conditions including light exposure. Stability Indicating Method
Development With novel drug candidates entering the market each day, the assay
methodologies used to provide accurate and well-understood stability testing
results must also continue to expand. HMR Labs not only performs stability
testing, but also develops stability indicating assay methods to accurately
detect and quantify the degradation of products. We take into account the
unique formulation and manufacturing challenges our customers face and provide
a methodology that is a scalable and valuable asset for wider stability
testing applications. Pharmaceutical Stability Storage Our stability storage
solution is expansive and compatible ith a range of requirements to ensure the
integrity and quality of pharmaceutical products. The state-of-the-art
facility is located in Rochdale, UK, providing stability testing services
without compromise to factors such as capacity, study length or turnaround
times. Covering a broad spectrum of testing conditions, HMR Labs can run
storage studies to meet all standard ICH guidelines and conditions. We also
offer specialised testing environments such as refrigeration, frozen and other
bespoke conditions when requested. We work collaboratively to ensure a
streamlined process, from study design to execution. HMR Labs delivers the
highest industry standards in pharmaceutical stability storage. Quality
Assured, Regulatory Stability Guidance Creating long term partnerships is our
priority. We are dedicated to timely communication, collaborative research and
proactive support throughout project lifecycles; it is vital that regulatory
guidance and support is a part of this. We ensure that our stability testing
laboratory will meet international standards and perform analysis that will
enable smooth submissions to regulatory authorities, advance batch release and
confirm quality control. Saving you both valuable time and internal resources
during your drug development journey. Partner with HMR Labs for value-add
stability testing of pharmaceutical products and gain a competitive edge in
the pharmaceutical market. ALL OUR SERVICES START YOUR PROJECT Use
pharmacopeial or customer specific methodologies PRECISION and reliability in
pROTOCOL PREPARATION KNowledge transfer and project management packages
available Contact Us Contact us today to discuss your specific test
requirements directly with our team of analytical scientists. All Services
Pharmaceutical Stability Testing and Storage gmp and Pharmaceutical
microbiologial testing Pharmaceutical finished product testing Inhalation drug
product testing analytical method development and validation Bespoke
pharmaceutical and analytical services HMR Labs © HMR Labs 2021 Testing
Services Bespoke Projects Our Labs About Us News Contact Us Loading
Comments... Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product
Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation Bespoke Projects
Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us


 
https://hmrlabs.com/inhalation-drug-product-testing/
Inhalation Drug Product Testing - HMR Labs HMR Labs Skip to content Herd Mundy
Richardson Limited +44 (0) 161 406 6767 info@hmrlabs.com Testing Services
Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient Method
Development and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us
News Contact Us Inhalation Drug Product Testing Inhalation drug product
testing is a crucial factor in ensuring that orally inhaled and nasal drug
products (OINDP) are safe and effective for use. Characterising inhalation
drug products ensures they meet stringent quality assurance standards and are
free from contaminants. From metered dose inhalers (MDIs) to dry powder
inhalers (DPIs) and soft mist inhalers (SMIs), nebuliser solutions,
suspensions and aerosols, HMR Labs has the expertise to quality test a wide
range of inhalation drug products. With specialised equipment and
pharmaceutical testing knowledge, our technical team are well-versed in
performing the necessary tests and analyses to characterise inhaled product
formulations, dose uniformity and particle fractions. Our state-of-the-art
instrumentation also provides FDA, EMA and other regulatory body compliance.
Although testing applications vary depending on the type of inhaled
medication, our inhalation test laboratories house the very best in innovative
techniques and instrumentation to provide you with the safety and efficacy
data you need. Start your inhalation drug product testing journey: Get in
touch with hmr labs Purpose built laboratories housing a range of qualified
equipment Extensive knowledge of a variety of dosage forms Inclusive of novel
drug compounds Quality Inhalation Drug Product Testing and Analysis HMR Labs
offers a comprehensive range of inhalation drug product tests, which encompass
techniques optimised and developed specifically for the inhaled product and
its intended use. We have dedicated resources for inhalation testing at our
facilities, which allows pharmaceutical manufacturers to accelerate their
product release to a timeframe that suits them. HMR Labs is passionate about
working to customer requirements, which is why drug development companies
choose us to support their inhaled product development. Whether it’s routine
inhaled drug product testing to specification or ICH stability testing to
assure shelf life and impurity analysis, HMR Labs are committed to executing
projects where the customer is in control. A robust project management system
gives our customers immediate access to Project Managers directly involved in
the project. Looking for inhaled product testing that’s cGMP and ICH
compliant? SPEAK TO A TEAM MEMBER Our specific inhaled product
characterisation testing includes; Aerodynamic particle size distribution Drug
delivery rate and total drug substance delivered Valve delivery (shot weight)
Leak rate Moisture content analysis Microbial limits Emitted dose and content
uniformity Net content (fill weight) Input material analysis to compendial
specifications Impurities and degradation products
Alcohol/antioxidants/preservatives content Bespoke Method Development for
Inhaled Drug Products HMR Labs’ purpose-built inhalation laboratories house an
expansive range of qualified equipment, including high resolution and high
throughput Agilent and Waters HPLC and UHPLC chromatography systems. We also
offer Next Generation Impactor (NGI) analysis, Anderson Cascade Impactor (ACI)
analysis, as well as a variety of impingers, Dosage Unit Sampling Apparatus
(DUSA) and Breathing Simulators. All are in accordance with compendial
requirements. With over 35 years of pharmaceutical testing expertise centred
around regulatory compliant services, the HMR team understand the complexities
and challenges involved in the development of inhaler technologies. Our
testing and validation services can be designed with your specific
requirements in mind. Whether motivated by time restraints, cost
effectiveness, scalable methodology or refined formulation requirements, our
bespoke projects and expert method validation services can ensure inhaled
product testing is in line with GMP and ICH protocols, while meeting your
bespoke requirements. Take advantage of HMR Labs’ practical knowledge of
inhalation delivery systems and gain the data and assurance you need to
demonstrate inhaled product safety. OUR BESPOKE PROJECTS START your project
Contact Us Contact us today to discuss your specific test requirements
directly with our team of analytical scientists. All Services Pharmaceutical
Stability Testing and Storage gmp and Pharmaceutical microbiologial testing
Pharmaceutical finished product testing Inhalation drug product testing
analytical method development and validation Bespoke pharmaceutical and
analytical services HMR Labs © HMR Labs 2021 Testing Services Bespoke Projects
Our Labs About Us News Contact Us Loading Comments... Testing Services
Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient Method
Development and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us
News Contact Us


 
https://hmrlabs.com/pharmaceutical-finished-product-testing/
Pharmaceutical Finished Product Testing - HMR Labs HMR Labs Skip to content
Herd Mundy Richardson Limited +44 (0) 161 406 6767 info@hmrlabs.com Testing
Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient
Method Development and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation
About Us News Contact Us Pharmaceutical Finished Product Testing Comprehensive
testing of pharmaceutical finished products requires the assessment of purity,
potency, quality, uniformity, stability and much more. HMR Labs offers a wide
scope of pharmaceutical finished product testing, incorporating a breadth of
analytical technologies and techniques across chemical, physical and
microbiological testing. We undertake finished product testing on
pharmaceutical products for a number of different purposes: Pharmaceutical
batch release testing GMP in-process manufacturing testing Comparator analysis
testing validation HMR Labs’ collaborative pharmaceutical finished product
testing services can support batch release requirements as well as ongoing
batch record QA/QC, GMP assurance, regulatory compliance and fully validated,
customised testing programs. If you’re looking for a value-add provider of the
most essential component involved in ensuring batch release integrity, safety
and quality, work with us: Get in touch with hmr labs cGMP testing and
analysis Testing conducted at a variety of drug development stages Finished
product testing submission and audit documentation Pharmaceutical Batch
Release Testing Pharmaceutical batch release testing can vary depending on the
nature of the pharmaceutical product and the regulatory requirements of
individual markets, however HMR Labs’ analytical and technical teams have the
expertise and knowledge to conduct batch release testing in accordance with
all internationally recognised compendial methods (e.g. Ph.Eur., BP, USP and
JP) as well as custom validated release test methods. Our GMP compliant
analytical chemistry and microbiological testing laboratories house a range of
state-of-the-art instrumentation. With innovative technologies available to
meet the quality, safety and regulatory standards set for final product
inspection. From ICP mass spectrometry to chromatography, spectrophotometry
and more, HMR Labs has expertise with even the most complex testing methods to
ensure a streamlined pharmaceutical batch release program with MHRA, FDA and
other regulatory body requirements. Work with HMR Labs to establish your batch
release testing timeframes, budget and requirements, and we will tailor your
testing program to suit. Helping manufacturers globally to meet quality and
safety analysis of finished products. SPEAK TO A TEAM MEMBER Quality Control
of Finished Product Manufacturing Manage the quality assurance of your batch
manufacturing through in-process finished product testing. This type of
analysis, carried out in real time can help to ensure that finished
pharmaceutical products are being manufactured to within the desired quality
control specification and regulations. HMR Labs own MHRA inspected
laboratories. These provide in-depth quality control and in-process testing
services. Highlighting manufacturing and supply chain quality improvements
through finish product testing and analysis. Access formulation assessment and
evaluations which can provide valuable performance insight of specific batches
prior to sale. Find out how our extensive experience with GMP testing can help
assess your manufacturing processes. Comparator Studies for Pharmaceutical
Validation HMR Labs are experienced with undertaking finished product testing
to support comparative analysis testing for a wide range of formulations and
finished product types. This type of finished product testing helps customers
understand whether a finished product is relative or superior to an existing
product through comparator study. Alternatively, further pharmaceutical
assessment can determine whether a product is equivalent in terms of in-vitro
performance, including to a marketed therapeutic, validating comparative bio-
equivalence. For IVBE studies, we also offer a fully compliant service in-line
with international regulatory guidances. Our comparator testing services also
include stability storage and analysis, method development and validation, as
well as an extensive range of product development and performance
characterisation studies. Over 35 year’s experience Extensive testing
methodologies and validation Long term finished product testing partnerships
OUR BESPOKE PROJECTS START your Testing Journey Contact Us Contact us today to
discuss your specific test requirements directly with our team of analytical
scientists. All Services Pharmaceutical Stability Testing and Storage gmp and
Pharmaceutical microbiologial testing Pharmaceutical finished product testing
Inhalation drug product testing analytical method development and validation
Bespoke pharmaceutical and analytical services HMR Labs © HMR Labs 2021
Testing Services Bespoke Projects Our Labs About Us News Contact Us Loading
Comments... Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product
Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation Bespoke Projects
Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us


 
https://hmrlabs.com/pharmaceutical-microbiological-testing/
Pharmaceutical Microbiological Testing - HMR Labs Skip to content Herd Mundy
Richardson Limited +44 (0) 161 406 6767 info@hmrlabs.com Testing Services
Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient Method
Development and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us
News Contact Us GMP Testing and Pharmaceutical Microbiological Testing Our
pharmaceutical microbiological testing services are a critical component of
safety and quality assurance during good manufacturing practice (cGMP)
analysis. GMP testing provides insight not only on long term environmental and
manufacturing contamination hazards, but also sheds light on the microbial
limits and preservative efficacy of new products for approval processes. HMR
Labs can help you uncover any harmful microorganisms present in finished
products and validate the effectiveness of manufacturing processes. It’s
important that microbiological testing be a part of a wider, end-to-end
pharmaceutical solution, inclusive of method validation through to raw
materials and finished product testing. Regardless of whether our
pharmaceutical microbiological testing is utilised as a stand-alone service or
as a support function of the wider departments, we can assist with controlling
microbial contaminations, including: bacteria, yeast, mould and more. Develop
formulations and good manufacturing processes that can withstand microbial
challenges with our GMP testing services. Dedicated In-house microbiology unit
Expert guidance on process improvements Identification of bacterial and fungal
isolates using a range of techniques Microbiological Identification & Testing
HMR Labs offers a consultative approach which allows us to work with customers
to implement appropriate corrective actions based on all vital information
gathered from our suite of pharmaceutical microbiological testing. Through
strategic partnerships, HMR Labs are able to offer the most advanced ID
techniques available. This provides innovative characterisation methods for
the specific microorganisms found in products, or manufacturing environments.
Microbial Limits Testing Assess the total viable microbial count present in
your products with the help of HMR Labs. Using pharmacopeial (BP, Ph.Eur.,
USP, JP) or customer-centric methodologies, we can determine quantity and
specific species’ present in a drug. Batch release and GMP testing are heavily
reliant on microbial limits testing to ensure product safety, regulatory
(including FDA and MHRA) compliance, process control, stability and sterility
validation and batch to batch consistency. Preservative Efficacy Testing
Pharmaceutical drug compounds require antimicrobial protection to ensure they
can withstand potential contaminations during their intended shelf life. HMR
Labs can test the effectiveness of the preservatives in your formulations,
demonstrating the anti-microbial activity of a particular product offers
adequate protection. Endotoxin Testing Methods Severe adverse effects that can
affect patient safety may arise if bacterial endotoxins are identified in a
pharmaceutical drug product. Regardless of whether it is an ingredient, water
supplies used in manufacturing processes or the finished drug product, HMR
Labs can determine the presence of bacterial endotoxins. Limulus Amoebocyte
Lysate (LAL) endotoxin test are essential for parenteral products which plan
to be used in contact with the bloodstream, including injectable medications,
IV solutions, vaccines, anaesthetics and pain management medications. The LAL
bacterial endotoxin test performed at HMR Labs accurately identifies and
quantifies endotoxicity contaminant levels. Bioburden and Environmental
Testing Broadening the scope of quantifying the microorganisms present during
drug compound formulation leads to bioburden testing as well as environmental
testing and residue testing. HMR Labs offers the flexibility to help
pharmaceutical manufacturers understand the potential threat of microorganism
presence in their production environment as well as raw materials, residues
and final pharmaceutical products. Evaluation of Disinfectants and Biocides
Performed against BSEN, and other regulatory standards, HMR Labs also offers
the capability to assess the bactericidal activity of disinfectants and
biocides on a range of surfaces. As part of GMP testing, this service is
principally used as a development tool for new R&D product assessment prior to
final product formulation. Complete Microbiological and Analytical Testing
Collectively, microbiological testing and our wider testing services can
maintain compliance of raw materials, batch released products and
manufacturing practices. As a value-add provider, HMR Labs is committed to
being a one-stop shop for pharmaceutical manufacturers. Our analytical testing
portfolio allows our customers to take advantage of further services which
ensure the quality, safety and efficacy of drug compounds. Depending on dosage
form and intended use, HMR Labs can advise on the most efficient and strategic
testing timeline to validate methodologies and streamline batch release. ALL
OUR SERVICES START YOUR PROJECT Use pharmacopeial or customer specific
methodologies Validation protocols and reports which meet ICH guidelines cGMP
testing and compliance Contact Us Contact us today to discuss your specific
test requirements directly with our team of analytical scientists. All
Services Pharmaceutical Stability Testing and Storage gmp and Pharmaceutical
microbiologial testing Pharmaceutical finished product testing Inhalation drug
product testing analytical method development and validation Bespoke
pharmaceutical and analytical services HMR Labs © HMR Labs 2021 Testing
Services Bespoke Projects Our Labs About Us News Contact Us Loading
Comments... Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product
Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation Bespoke Projects
Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us


 
https://hmrlabs.com/api-testing-and-excipient-testing/
API Testing and Excipient Testing - HMR Labs Skip to content Herd Mundy
Richardson Limited +44 (0) 161 406 6767 info@hmrlabs.com Testing Services
Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient Method
Development and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us
News Contact Us Active Pharmaceutical Ingredient (API Testing) and Excipient
Testing Compendial methods play a significant role in the evaluation and
validation of active pharmaceutical ingredient testing. HMR Labs pride
ourselves on our range of active and inactive ingredient testing services,
assuring the quality, safety, and efficacy of drug compound formulations. API
and excipient testing is a fundamental tool to ensuring that all aspects of a
drug product meet the required quality and regulatory standards. Through a
combination of advanced analytical techniques and compendial methods, HMR Labs
are able to perform comprehensive testing which delivers reliable results. GET
IN TOUCH WITH HMR LABS in-house scientists are personal project managers
Standard and custom developed testing methods 35+ YEARS OF PHARMACEutical
testing experience Expertise in API Testing and Excipient Testing We
understand that as a pharmaceutical testing provider, the role we play in
ensuring the quality, safety and efficacy of ongoing drug substances and raw
materials sourced by manufacturers and biotechnology organisations is crucial
in ensuring the integrity of the pharmaceutical supply chain. Not only must
API and excipient testing methods provide complete data, but the techniques
employed can also deliver comprehensive therapeutic performance insights.
Excipient Testing Requirements Inert substances are naturally added to a
pharmaceutical formulation to impart suitable bulking, consistency, and
stability, thereby achieving the desired properties in the finished product.
The testing of these inactive compounds is required to assess their impact on
the quality and performance of the final formulation. This is why, HMR Labs
employ a diverse range of advanced testing methods to ensure excipients
contribute effectively to creating a compliant and effective pharmaceutical
product. It is a regulatory expectation to fully understand the effects of
each ingredient on the performance of a finished drug product, excipient
analysis plays an essential role in providing this insight. Looking for a
provider that is dedicated to capturing the data required for assurance of
quality and compliance? API Testing The analytical testing of active
pharmaceutical ingredients (APIs) requires adherence to regulations set by the
MHRA, FDA and many other regulatory bodies. In order to provide our customers
with the exact information required, our API testing services can be tailored
to evaluate conformance against all internationally recognised pharmacopeial
standards including USP-NF, BP, Ph.Eur., and JP, helping to demonstrate
testing compliance for a variety of markets. HMR Labs house a range of state-
of-the-art instruments to facilitate spectroscopy (AA, UV-Vis, FT-IR),
chromatography (UHPLC/HPLC and GC) and mass spectrometry (ICP-MS) testing
techniques required for identity, purity and potency testing. Continued
investment in our analytical facilities allows us to offer a tailored testing
solution to meet your unique requirements. This allows for flexibility in
testing approaches, sampling regimes and testing frequency. Compendial Testing
Methods of Active and Inactive Ingredients Many pharmaceutical manufacturers
and biotechnology organisations will partner with an outsourced testing
provider for API and excipient testing. Choosing the right provider of these
services will ensure that the API and excipient testing is not only compliant
with GMP regulations, but also meets specific testing program requirements.
HMR Labs prides itself on being a value-add pharmaceutical API and excipient
testing provider by offering convenient testing turnaround times and access to
our in-house expertise and compendial testing knowledge. We offer a valuable
and cost-effective outsourcing solution which accounts for the full range of
analytical techniques, instrumentation and technical guidance required to
support your API and excipient testing programs. HMR Labs have assisted
numerous global manufacturers with the analytical assessment of their
pharmaceutical raw materials, providing reliable data and insights on factors
including: Identification Purification Particle size Moisture content Residual
solvents Compatibility Microbial contamination We employ both standardised
compendial testing methods in accordance with the official pharmacopeial
monographs as well as bespoke customer or in-house methodologies. This ensures
HMR Labs results are consistent and comparable from our testing laboratories
to your manufacturing site. Compendial methods facilitate regulatory
compliance and our experience across the pharmaceutical sector ensures we can
advise on appropriate method verification or validation and compatibility with
novel compounds. If you’re looking for a laboratory partner that offers
transparent guidance and traceability to support your pharmaceutical
ingredient release testing or manufacturing programs, HMR Labs would be
delighted to hear from you. HMR Labs have been continuously developing and
improving our API testing services for over 35 years and are proud to have
built a reputation during that time of offering a reliable, responsive and
compliant pharmaceutical testing service. ALL OUR SERVICES START YOUR PROJECT
USE pharmacopeial or customer specific methodologies PRECISION AND RELIABILITY
IN PROTOCOL PREPARATION KNOWLEDGE TRANSFER AND PROJECT MANAGEMENT PACKAGES
AVAILABLE Contact Us Contact us today to discuss your specific test
requirements directly with our team of analytical scientists. All Services
Pharmaceutical Stability Testing and Storage gmp and Pharmaceutical
microbiologial testing Pharmaceutical finished product testing Inhalation drug
product testing analytical method development and validation Bespoke
pharmaceutical and analytical services HMR Labs © HMR Labs 2021 Testing
Services Bespoke Projects Our Labs About Us News Contact Us Loading
Comments... Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product
Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation Bespoke Projects
Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us


 
https://hmrlabs.com/analytical-development-and-validation/
Pharmaceutical Method Development - HMR Labs Skip to content Herd Mundy
Richardson Limited +44 (0) 161 406 6767 info@hmrlabs.com Testing Services
Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient Method
Development and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us
News Contact Us Analytical Method Development and Validation Expertly
developed and validated methodologies are essential contributors to ensuring
accurate, reliable and compliant analytical data. HMR Labs can tailor this
critical process to suit the specific requirements of the primary drug
candidate and its intended use. As an MHRA inspected laboratory, HMR Labs can
offer versatile and bespoke pharmaceutical method development with cost
effective pricing and quick turnaround times. Designing, optimising and
refining analytical methods provides assurance over qualitative or
quantitative measurements of substance parameters, including; stability and
potency. Meanwhile, evidential validation and assessment of these methods both
certifies regulatory compliance as well as ensuring the reliability of
collected analytical data. Streamline batch release and accelerate your
research with HMR Labs; developing reputable analytical methodologies for ICH
validation. Get in touch with hmr labs ICH compliant reports generated on your
behalf Extensive knowledge of a variety of dosage forms Purpose built
laboratories housing a range of qualified equipment Pharmaceutical Method
Development At the centre of every developed testing methodology is
robustness, precision, selectivity, sensitivity, linearity, and accuracy.
Encompassing a wide range of techniques derived from decades of experience,
HMR Labs utilises chromatography (UHPLC, HPLC, GC) spectroscopy (FTIR, UV-
Vis), titration and more to strategically navigate regulatory compliance and
testing requirements. Regardless of whether you’re a pharmaceutical
manufacturer or drug development organisation, HMR Labs’ analytical method
development service partners collaborative project execution, a direct contact
to scientific project managers and the provision of method transfer protocols
with cost effective and accessible industry expertise. A well-developed
analytical method reduces the likelihood of false results or errors,
minimising the need for retesting and potential recalls. From the selection of
the analytical techniques, to the choosing of instrumentation, setting of
calibration ranges and addressing of product matrix interferences, HMR Labs
are always focused on the goal of creating a method which is suitable for each
specific drug, dosage form and intended use. Invest in a partnership with HMR
Labs and mitigate the risk of unreliable results. SPEAK TO A TEAM MEMBER
Method Validation in Pharmaceutical Analysis Irrespective of the type of
testing methodology, validating and verifying that the method will return
accurate and reliable results involves a careful assessment of the
specificity, linearity, precision and robustness. The key ICH guidelines for
validation shape HMR Labs’ services, with regulatory compliance being
paramount to our customers. Method validation is a regulatory expectation we
can assist with, by generating the documented evidence that is necessary for
regulatory approval. Inclusive of novel drug compounds cGMP testing and
analysis Direct contact with project manager Flexible Services and Bespoke
Projects HMR Labs is dedicated to offering a flexible approach towards
stability and analytical testing requirements. Many pharmaceutical
manufacturers require robust and validated testing methodologies which are
purpose built to suit their needs. Pharmaceutical products also come in
diverse formulations, dosage forms and active ingredients. By tailoring our
services to align with each drug compound’s specific characteristics, HMR Labs
can offer faster development timelines, cost effective refinement cycles and
adherence to regulatory standards. Stability and analytical testing
particularly, can be optimised to achieve desired levels of sensitivity and
accuracy which are critical for detecting low levels of impurities and APIs.
As well as method development, HMR Labs can also validate the robustness of
any developed method to ensure it is fit for purpose. All whilst continuing to
produce reliable data across the product lifecycle. OUR BESPOKE PROJECTS START
your project Contact Us Contact us today to discuss your specific test
requirements directly with our team of analytical scientists. All Services
Pharmaceutical Stability Testing and Storage gmp and Pharmaceutical
microbiologial testing Pharmaceutical finished product testing Inhalation drug
product testing analytical method development and validation Bespoke
pharmaceutical and analytical services HMR Labs © HMR Labs 2021 Testing
Services Bespoke Projects Our Labs About Us News Contact Us Loading
Comments... Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product
Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation Bespoke Projects
Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us


 
https://hmrlabs.com/pharmaceutical-and-analytical-testing-services/
Bespoke Analytical Testing Projects - HMR Labs Skip to content Herd Mundy
Richardson Limited +44 (0) 161 406 6767 info@hmrlabs.com Testing Services
Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient Method
Development and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us
News Contact Us Pharmaceutical and Analytical Testing Services Bespoke
Analytical and Pharmaceutical Testing Services At HMR Labs we’re passionate
about ensuring your journey to batch release is devised to best suit your
pharmaceutical products and formulations. We have spent over 35 years
delivering pharmaceutical testing services as well as wider contract
analytical testing services. Our expanding techniques have led us to execute a
number of custom pharmaceutical and analytical testing services which broaden
our routine capabilities. HMR Labs is well placed to assist with wider bespoke
projects and custom testing workflows. With decades of expertise, our team of
Analytical Scientists, Chemists, Technicians and method development experts
can provide the consultancy and advisory support pharmaceutical and drug
development companies need during their commercialisation and manufacturing
journey. Looking for assured guidance for internal quality control and GMP
compliance, or to release your product with regulatory, FDA and MHRA approval?
HMR Labs can work with you to identify the best method or approach to get you
the data you need. Start your bespoke project Custom Batch Release Testing
Journeys HMR Labs can work with you to tailor various aspects of your batch
release process to meet the specific needs of your pharmaceutical products and
the regulatory requirements of various international markets. All projects
typically start with a plan to establish the testing methods required. Whether
it’s development of a novel method, conducting a method transfer, method
verification or the validation of a previously developed method, HMR Labs
ensure that eachindividual test method will satisfy regulatory expectations.
Drug product safety and efficacy can then be evaluated in accordance with GMP,
FDA and MHRA requirements as well as standard ICH and pharmacopeial protocols,
whilst still having a central focus on the specific drug compound’s unique
characteristics. From tablets, capsules, inhaled products, oral liquids and
other pharmaceuticals, HMR Labs services also cater for the wider GMP
activities required to assure the quality and ongoing safety of pharmaceutical
products, from manufacturing site validation and monitoring, ingredients
analysis, container and packaging integrity testing and more. Begin Bespoke
Project The Various Stages of Your Custom Batch Release Testing Pharmaceutical
and analytical testing services shouldn’t always be routine; partner with HMR
Labs to develop a testing timeline that suits you: Work with HMR Labs to
define your requirements Begin an initial consultation with our scientific
team HMR Labs will HELP DEVELOP A STRATEGY FOR ACHIEVING a custom batch
release testing plan All TESTING methods will be validated ACCORDING TO
regulAtory REQUIREMENTS AND established in our labs Devise a sampling plan
that ensures an adequate supply of representative samples from each batch
manufacture Communicate directly with your scientific project manager involved
in testing Gain data that supports the release decision for every batch Speak
to a team member Bespoke Analytical Testing Capabilities at HMR Labs In
addition to our portfolio of pharmaceutical and analytical testing services,
HMR Labs provide a breadth of services which expand upon our routine testing
capabilities. If you’re looking for additional support for your manufacturing
processes, including validation of cleanrooms, environmental monitoring or
cleaning validation, we can supply a range of ongoing services or specific
validation studies to ensure that the highest possible standards of cGMP
compliance are maintained in your production areas. HMR Labs take the time to
carefully consider the planning and execution of method validation studies,
technology transfers, method equivalence studies and more, to ensure
successful outcomes. With expansive knowledge and testing capabilities, HMR
Labs is well equipped to provide a range of services including ICH stability
and photodegradation studies. This expands to other environmental evaluations
such as thermocycling (freeze/thaw) studies, temperature excursion studies and
more. We have a wealth of experience in supporting pharmaceutical companies
with the in-vitro performance testing of finished products, such as bio-
equivalence studies or comparative testing, as well as clinical testing
requirements such as simulated patient use trials and human factors studies.
OUR BESPOKE SERVICES OUR INDUSTRY EXPERTISE Contact Us Contact us today to
discuss your specific test requirements directly with our team of analytical
scientists. All Services Pharmaceutical Stability Testing and Storage gmp and
Pharmaceutical microbiologial testing Pharmaceutical finished product testing
Inhalation drug product testing analytical method development and validation
Bespoke pharmaceutical and analytical services HMR Labs © HMR Labs 2021
Testing Services Bespoke Projects Our Labs About Us News Contact Us Loading
Comments... Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product
Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation Bespoke Projects
Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us


 
https://hmrlabs.com/pharmaceutical-testing-laboratory/
Pharmaceutical Testing Laboratory at HMR Labs Skip to content Herd Mundy
Richardson Limited +44 (0) 161 406 6767 info@hmrlabs.com Testing Services
Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient Method
Development and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us
News Contact Us Our Labs Pharmaceutical Testing Laboratory and Facilities HMR
Labs is an established, independent provider of pharmaceutical testing
services. Our pharmaceutical contract testing laboratories are well equipped
with the most advanced instrumentation and analytical teams which deliver on-
time, high quality analysis projects. We’re founded on offering our partners
four key pillars of service, which are important to their journey to shelves:
Flexible analytical testing services; from supporting novel drug compounds and
unique formulations to turnaround time and cost effectiveness, HMR Labs is
dedicated to offering a flexible analytical testing service to meet your
needs. Bespoke projects and services which ensure combined expert, regulatory
and quality testing for a range of pharmaceutical products and needs. Adding
value to routine pharmaceutical testing through robust project management,
valuable knowledge and experience, complete data integrity, next generation
test capabilities and a wide range of facilities. Innovating research and
development through investment in state-of-the-art equipment, instrumentation,
testing techniques and technology updates. Delivering contemporary testing to
advance wider manufacturing needs. Access Our Pharmaceutical Testing Labs
Through our expansive pharmaceutical contract testing portfolio, we can offer
routine testing in-line with ICH stability and regulatory guidelines. HMR Labs
also offers our bespoke projects which aid pharmaceutical manufacturers and
drug development organisations to overcome roadblocks in their development of
manufacturing programs, validation and product release. All of our services
are tailored to suit the exact testing parameters and capabilities our
customers require, offering a solution to any challenges currently faced. We
work with our partners to: Reduce testing costs and accelerate speed to market
Bridge knowledge gaps through expert testing support and guidance Ensure
pharmaceutical product safety, efficacy and quality Deliver stringent
regulatory (GMP, MHRA and FDA) compliance Build long term partnerships View
our testing services Our Pharmaceutical Testing Laboratories Located in the
North-West of England for over 35 years, HMR Labs is made up of four
microbiological testing laboratories and eleven custom designed analytical
chemistry laboratories. We also offer a comprehensive stability testing
service with storage at all ICH conditions as well as refrigerated, frozen and
tailored conditions. HMR Labs’ infrastructure is designed for precision,
quality and commitment, with large scale programs and routine testing being
second nature to our teams of analytical scientists. An Innovative GMP
Compliant Laboratory HMR Labs works closely with the wider pharmaceutical
testing market so we can continually assess and improve our processes to
deliver methods and projects that are of high quality and at the forefront of
modern testing. Advancing our capabilities involves regularly qualifying and
calibrating our instrumentation as well as adapting to the latest testing
technologies and using our in-house knowledge to develop analytical procedures
that will satisfy ICH requirements. From analytical data to QA/QC audits and
regulatory submissions, we handle all the data transferred or generated with
the utmost care. The integrity of the data we produce is complete and
consistent in accordance with GMP compliance. VIEW FULL SERVICEs VIEW
Instrumentation All Services Pharmaceutical Stability Testing and Storage gmp
and Pharmaceutical microbiologial testing Pharmaceutical finished product
testing Inhalation drug product testing analytical method development and
validation Bespoke pharmaceutical and analytical services HMR Labs © HMR Labs
2021 Testing Services Bespoke Projects Our Labs About Us News Contact Us
Loading Comments... Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished
Product Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation Bespoke
Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us


 
https://hmrlabs.com/instrumentation/
Instrumentation - HMR Labs Skip to content Herd Mundy Richardson Limited +44
(0) 161 406 6767 info@hmrlabs.com Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product
Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation
Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us
Instrumentation A vast range of instrumentation and equipment, qualified,
regularly maintained and calibrated in compliance with cGMP and ICH
requirements enables us to offer a comprehensive analytical testing service to
the pharmaceutical industry. ﻿ – Waters Acquity UPLC and Agilent 1200 RRLC
systems – Agilent 6890 and 7820 GC systems with packed and capillary column
capabilities, head-space injectors and FID/TCD detectors – ICP mass
spectometry (ICP-MS) – AAS/AES (with graphite furnace/vapour accessories) –
UV/Vis and FTIR spectrophotometers – Various KF analysers, autotitrators, ion
and pH meters – Agilent 1100 HPLC systems with variable wavelength, refractive
index, fluorescence and diode array detectors – Specialist inhalation testing
equipment, such as Next Generation Impactors (NGI), Andersen Cascade Impactors
(ACI), Dosage Unit Sampling Apparatus (DUSA) and Breathing Simulators –
Dissolution apparatus (USP 1, 2, 3, 5, 6 and 7) – Disintegration, friability
and hardness testers – Osmometer, refractometer and polarimeter – Olympus
System BHT microscope – Ancillary equipment, including balances weighing up to
7 decimal places Contact Us Contact us today to discuss your specific test
requirements directly with our team of analytical scientists. HMR Labs © HMR
Labs 2021 Testing Services Bespoke Projects Our Labs About Us News Contact Us
Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological
Ingredient Method Development and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs
Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us


 
https://hmrlabs.com/about/
About Us - HMR Labs Skip to content Herd Mundy Richardson Limited +44 (0) 161
406 6767 info@hmrlabs.com Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished
Product Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation Bespoke
Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us About Us HMR is an
established, independent contract testing provider, committed to delivering
on-time, high quality analysis to the pharmaceutical industry. We aim to
develop long-term relationships with our customers based on a flexible,
reliable and open approach, and monitor our own performance by pre-defined key
performance indicators. Our Stockport facility comprises of eleven chemistry
and four microbiology custom designed laboratories. Due to the mainly
technical function of this site, we are able to keep overheads to a minimum,
making outsourcing of testing requirements a viable option for our clients. We
pride ourselves on the high standard of services we offer, based on a well-
developed and compliant quality system, motivated and experienced staff and a
range of calibrated, well-maintained equipment . Contact Us Contact us today
to discuss your specific test requirements directly with our team of
analytical scientists. HMR Labs © HMR Labs 2021 Testing Services Bespoke
Projects Our Labs About Us News Contact Us Testing Services Stability Inhaled
Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and
Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us


 
https://hmrlabs.com/blog/
News - HMR Labs Skip to content Herd Mundy Richardson Limited +44 (0) 161 406
6767 info@hmrlabs.com Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished
Product Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation Bespoke
Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us News ICH Stability
Testing and appropriate validation of analytical procedures 8th April 2024
Regardless of whether you’re at the pharmaceutical manufacturing stage, the
biotechnology research and development stage, or the drug discovery lead
generation stage of the drug candidate lifecycle, ICH guidelines play a
powerful role in guaranteeing the safety, efficacy and quality of those
candidates that make it to the shelves. As regulatory agencies work to
implement… Read more Revolutionising respiratory health: inhalation drug
product testing 11th September 2023 It’s estimated that around 545 million
individuals worldwide live with chronic respiratory conditions. Given its
prevalence, inhalation therapeutics are an integral focus within the R&D realm
to evolve treatments. With inhalation pharmaceutical developments comes a
comprehensive range of testing methods and tools, used to validate and qualify
each new product as safe and viable and… Read more Behind the Scenes:
Unveiling the essential role of finished product testing 26th July 2023
Pharmaceutical innovation is one of the main driving forces behind healthcare
advances. Piloting new and enhanced treatments has accelerated public health
to never-before-seen heights. From drug discovery and development to clinical
research trials, each pharmaceutical product will undergo a substantial
journey, with safety, efficacy and quality closely monitored throughout the
process to confirm its continuation.… Read more The dissolution solution:
meaningful drug development 17th May 2023 At the heart of pharmaceutical
testing, is drug dissolution, a crucial stage in drug development. Dissolution
testing is formulated to assess the drug release rate from a particular dosage
form, evaluating the intrinsic ability of the drug to dissolve and absorb into
the bloodstream. In other words, the dissolution profile obtained from testing
helps assess… Read more The benefits of outsourcing your pharmaceutical
testing requirements 3rd May 2023 Outsourcing analytical testing is an
extremely attractive solution to the pharmaceutical and biotechnology
industry. With the inherently competitive nature of the life science sector as
a whole, companies are eager to come to market at a faster pace, meaning a
continuous pressure for both drug development and subsequent testing
requirements. Given the ever-increasing level of… Read more HMR Are Attending
Making Pharmaceuticals 2021 28th September 2021 HMR are happy to announce that
next week we will be attending the Making Pharmaceuticals Exhibition and
Conference 2021. HMR can be found at stand 131 in the Laboratory Zone. The
Making Pharmaceuticals Exhibition and Conference 2021 is a two day event held
at the Coventry Building Society Arena on the 5th and 6th of… Read more HMR’s
New Website Design Has Now Gone Live! 21st May 2021 We are very excited to
officially announce the launch of our new website design! You can find us at
www.hmrlabs.com With the launch of HMR’s brand new website, our aim behind the
redesign is to create a clean, interactive browsing experience for current and
prospective clients. By improving the structure of our content, it has never…
Read more HMR Labs © HMR Labs 2021 Testing Services Bespoke Projects Our Labs
About Us News Contact Us Loading Comments... Testing Services Stability
Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient Method Development
and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact
Us


 
https://hmrlabs.com/contact/
Contact Us - HMR Labs Skip to content Herd Mundy Richardson Limited +44 (0)
161 406 6767 info@hmrlabs.com Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product
Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation
Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us Contact Us
Please complete the below form to discuss your specific test requirements
directly with our team of analytical scientists. Get in touch Address: Herd
Mundy Richardson Ltd Oak House Bredbury Park Way Ashton Road Bredbury
Stockport SK6 2SN United Kingdom Phone: +44 (0) 161 406 6767 Email:
info@hmrlabs.com Follow us: Contact Us HMR Labs © HMR Labs 2021 Testing
Services Bespoke Projects Our Labs About Us News Contact Us Testing Services
Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient Method
Development and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us
News Contact Us


 
https://hmrlabs.com/2024/04/08/ich-stability-testing-and-appropriate-validation-of-analytical-procedures/
ICH Stability Testing and appropriate validation of analytical procedures Skip to content Herd Mundy Richardson Limited +44 (0) 161 406 6767 info@hmrlabs.com Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us ICH Stability Testing and appropriate validation of analytical procedures ICH Stability Testing and appropriate validation of analytical procedures elizabethtaylornetworkscientificcouk Uncategorized 8th April 2024 | 0 Regardless of whether you’re at the pharmaceutical manufacturing stage, the biotechnology research and development stage, or the drug discovery lead generation stage of the drug candidate lifecycle, ICH guidelines play a powerful role in guaranteeing the safety, efficacy and quality of those candidates that make it to the shelves. As regulatory agencies work to implement the ICH Q2 (R2) this year, it is a perfect time to emphasise the importance of appropriate validation of analytical procedures related to stability testing. The International Council for Harmonisations of Technical Requirements for Pharmaceuticals for Human Use (ICH) protocols were designed through collaboration among regulatory authorities and pharmaceutical experts across the globe. They represent a consensus on the best practices for ensuring standardised testing methods where possible. In the rapidly evolving landscape of drug candidates, novel and innovative pharmaceuticals often require the development of bespoke and custom testing methodologies. In these cases, adherence to ICH protocols remains a regulatory requirement to ensure robust and reliable stability data. As an experienced contract analytical testing provider, HMR Labs has over 35 years of experience handling and developing a variety of stability procedures. Here’s what to consider when managing stability testing, validation studies and stability storage against the ICH guidelines. New revisions for ICH stability testing In late 2023, the ICH Q2 (R1) was replaced by the updated ICH Q2 (R2), reflecting modernisation efforts to align with contemporary technologies and processes. These guidelines are crucial for establishing, submitting, and maintaining evidence that demonstrates the suitability of an analytical procedure, for its intended testing purpose. In regards to stability, it is familiar to those in the sector, that we’re referring to a drug candidate remaining of high quality, safe for consumption and that the API is of high efficacy for the duration of its shelf life. The ICH guidelines play a pivotal role in addressing stability testing, a crucial stage that not only determines the shelf life but also appropriate storage conditions and requirements for batch release approval. But how can the ICH guidelines control the quality assurance of stability testing when the test methodology has been shaped to meet the requirements of the novel drug? This is where ICH stability guidelines come in. Method development in line with ICH stability protocols The design and planning of a stability study should always adhere to the requirements of the ICH Q1A – F. Key parameters that any developed method should be evaluated for during validation are outlined in the ICH Q2 (R2). These include: Specificity Accuracy Precision Lineraty and more These guidelines ensure that the devised stability studies and the validated, stability-indicating testing methods will generate the data required to determine the shelf life of a new drug product with precision. As well as shelf-life determination, a robust ICH stability testing method can help provide further insights on product formulation development, improve the likelihood of batch release, anticipate future storage and packaging requirements, and more. This is why any developed method must align with ICH protocols, as the data it yields is a representation of the pharmaceutical’s safety in accordance with the best practices of pharmaceutical testing in Japan, Europe, US and many other countries. So, what are the risks and challenges that manufacturers and organisations may encounter that could undermine their compliance with ICH stability guidelines during method development? Improper stability method development and validation The first concern with stability testing methods that are not developed and validated to conform with ICH protocols is the potential for inaccurate safety, quality and efficacy data. Ultimately, this could result in an incorrect determination of a product’s stability, leading to overly conservative or optimistic shelf life and storage conditions. This risk can result in product deterioration and potentially jeopardise individual patient safety and public health. Improper method development can be a result of a variety of factors, most commonly including: Inadequate stress testing Inadequate method development for your drug compounds has likely not considered all relevant stress factors, resulting in an incomplete evaluation of potential degradation pathways. Stress factors include: Temperature Humidity Light Oxidation A lack of knowledge about the drug product behaviours under stress conditions hinders the selection of appropriate stressors, leading to an improper assessment of stability. Lack of specificity Specificity refers to the method’s ability to determine the presence of an analyte without interference from the matrix of other compounds that exist within the test sample. A method that is not specific or fails to accurately measure the drug substance separately from impurities, degradation products or other compounds present will immediately raise concerns over the reliability and accuracy of stability data. A lack of specificity can result from a variety of factors, from ineffective method development procedures to inaccurate method transfer. Inadequate robustness testing A robust testing method is both consistent and reliable, obtaining results that remain unaffected when faced with minor variations in analytical conditions. Inadequate testing can result in less reliable methods that are subsequently sensitive to such variations. This could take the form of inadequate evaluation of the day-to-day variations expected during routine use, such as the reagents or equipment used, as well as studies to fully understand the effects of deliberate changes in method parameters, such as the mobile phase composition, pH, column temperature, flow rate and more. Inaccurate method transfer Accurate and concise method transfer is essential when moving an analytical method from its development or validation phase to its testing facility. This ensures that stability is assessed with a high degree of precision and accuracy. Nevertheless, inaccurate method transfer remains a significant concern for compliant analytical testing. Inaccurate method transfer can lead to inconsistencies in results between the transferring and receiving laboratories, leading to a potential impact on the reliability and validity of the collected data. In an environment where data quality is vital, this poses a significant issue. To maintain data consistency and stability data reliability, it is vital to establish comprehensive and well-documented procedures for method validation and transfer. A successful method transfer must ensure that the transferred procedure is being effectively and consistently applied in a different laboratory setting. This requires that the receiving laboratory possesses the necessary training as well as having the appropriate instrumentation to generate equivalent and reliable test results. ICH stability testing services with HMR Labs HMR Labs offers a valuable outsourced solution for your ICH stability development needs. We understand the intricacies of stability testing, enabling us to serve as a valued ICH stability partner through our protocol consultancy and stability study design capabilities. With access to state-of-the-art stability storage, coupled with our advanced testing equipment housed within our GMP-accredited laboratory, we can conduct your ICH stability testing with ease. We customise our methods development process to align meticulously with the ICH stability guidelines, ensuring high precision and compliance. Gain the confidence you need with your ICH stability study protocol development, and get in touch with HMR Labs. Post navigation Previous: Previous post: Revolutionising respiratory health: inhalation drug product testing Leave a Reply Cancel reply HMR Labs © HMR Labs 2021 Testing Services Bespoke Projects Our Labs About Us News Contact Us Discover more from HMR Labs Subscribe now to keep reading and get access to the full archive. Continue reading Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us


 
https://hmrlabs.com/2023/09/11/revolutionising-respiratory-health-with-inhalation-drug-product-testing/
Revolutionising respiratory health: inhalation drug product testing Skip to content Herd Mundy Richardson Limited +44 (0) 161 406 6767 info@hmrlabs.com Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us Revolutionising respiratory health: inhalation drug product testing Revolutionising respiratory health: inhalation drug product testing elizabethtaylornetworkscientificcouk Uncategorized 11th September 2023 | 0 It’s estimated that around 545 million individuals worldwide live with chronic respiratory conditions. Given its prevalence, inhalation therapeutics are an integral focus within the R&D realm to evolve treatments. With inhalation pharmaceutical developments comes a comprehensive range of testing methods and tools, used to validate and qualify each new product as safe and viable and provide critical insights into formulation and design. Modern medicine transforms inhalation therapeutics Innovation in inhalation products is driven by the need to manage life-threatening respiratory diseases. These therapeutics are widely executed within modern healthcare to manage the treatment of chronic respiratory conditions such as asthma, chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD) and cystic fibrosis. Such conditions are a collective and global burden to our health, as they require continuous management to ensure a patient’s quality of life remains sufficient. Inhalation therapies have a documented history dating back to ancient times, with the official development of inhalation chambers recorded during the 17th and 18th century. This laid the foundations for the commercialisation of steam-driven and powder inhalers. These then led to the most revolutionary step of inhalation therapeutic development; the first Metered-dose inhaler (MDI) devised in the 1950s . Fast forward to today where a vast range of devices are available, from MDIs, Dry Powder Inhalers (DPIs), Nebulisers, Breath-Actuated Inhalers and Soft Mist Inhalers (SMIs) to name a few. Continuing the pursuit of identifying pharmaceuticals with ultimate convenience, efficiency and effectiveness, modern inhalation therapies continue to evolve, from advanced inhaler technology to targeted drug delivery, novel medications and new drug formulations. Inhalation drug product testing Innovative inhalation approaches are being targeted by researchers as they present an opportunity to deliver new medications. With this comes the regulatory range of testing measures that assess all aspects of inhalation products. From metered dose inhalers (MDIs) to aerosol solutions for vaccines, insulin, gene therapies, and other innovative treatments, inhalation drug product testing is a vital stage in revolutionising modern medicine. It holds the potential to shape the way we approach therapeutic administration moving forward! Vital parameters in inhalation therapeutic assessment Standardised inhalation drug product testing methods ensure reliable assessment of chemical formulations and product designs, thus determining the overall quality, consistency and performance verification of new inhalation devices. These testing methods investigate important factors, including particle size, fine particle fraction (FPF), disposition pattern, lung deposition efficiency, as well as dissolution, stability, and microbiological parameters. Factors such as particle size, formulation changes and device modifications can all impact drug delivery, and so with every modification to the drug compound or device, testing is employed again to validate its efficacy. These testing methods require specialised inhalation equipment such as Next Generation Impactors (NGI), Andersen Cascade Impactors (ACI), Dosage Unit Sampling Apparatus (DUSA) and Breathing Simulators. We explore these in detail below: Andersen Cascade Impactors (ACIs) The original impactor, ACIs are widely used multistage impactors employed to separate particles based on their aerodynamic size. Researchers use this method to analyse particle size distributions and assess drug inhalation performance. This method employs a series of plates and impactor stages to create high-velocity jets of air. These transport the particles through the impactor in a cascading pattern, with all particles separated out based on their aerodynamic sizes. Next Generation Impactors (NGIs) Next Generation Impactors (NGIs) are an evolution of the ACI, designed specifically for pharmaceutical testing and deployed as a higher throughput and less labour-intensive technique. Used with metered-dose and dry-powder inhalers, nebulisers and nasal sprays, NGIs are often standard practice for assessing valuable parameters for drug efficiency and effective drug delivery. The process involves dividing particles by their aerodynamic properties, achieved through inertial impaction. As the aerosol sample passes through the impactor, inertial forces cause particles of varying sizes to change direction. This is often partnered with microscopy , or laser diffraction to assess particle characteristics such as size and particle morphology. As well as qualifying the effectiveness of the therapy, NGIs play an important role in evaluating formulation changes or design modifications to achieve optimal drug delivery formulations. Dosage Unit Sampling Apparatus Dosage unit sampling Apparatus (DUSA) involve specialised equipment often used to collect representative samples for the evaluation of dosage quality and uniformity. This provides valuable insight into its overall consistency and performance. The DUSA test involves sample collection via an adaptor, specifically designed to collect samples from inhalation and nasal spray devices. The sample is then analysed to determine the API content, using techniques such as HPLC or Spectroscopy. Breathing simulators Breathing simulators are highly efficient equipment that provides standardised and controlled testing conditions for drug evaluation. This process simulates human breathing patterns and characteristics by mimicking inhalation and exhalation patterns. Breathing simulators provide a range of respiratory parameters to be measured and analysed, including tidal volume, breathing frequency, inspiratory flow rate and breath-hold times. The simulators replicate breathing profiles by adjusting these parameters, simulating breathing patterns of people of all ages as well as those with specific respiratory conditions. In a controlled and reproducible environment, these simulators provide valuable assessment into drug delivery efficiency, allowing analysts to assess drug performance during formulation development. Safeguard your inhalation innovation with HMR To facilitate manufacturers on their drug development journey, many vital tools are used to assess drug delivery efficiency, optimise formulation development, and comply with regulatory requirements. The identification and evaluation of valuable parameters for inhaled drug effectiveness require thorough assessment, which can be tested with ease with HMR. Our full range of inhalation drug product testing equipment includes multi-stage impactors, dosage unit sampling devices and breathing simulators. Partnered with our team of analytical scientists with extensive inhalation expertise, it allows for an effortless drug evaluation process, including strict quality assurance processes to ensure accurate and reliable results. Looking to test your metered dose inhalers (MDIs), dry powder inhalers (DPIs), aqueous mist inhalers, nebuliser solutions , suspensions, or aerosols? HMR is here to help you on your journey to the shelf. Partner with HMR today. Post navigation Previous: Previous post: Behind the Scenes: Unveiling the essential role of finished product testing Next: Next post: ICH Stability Testing and appropriate validation of analytical procedures Leave a Reply Cancel reply HMR Labs © HMR Labs 2021 Testing Services Bespoke Projects Our Labs About Us News Contact Us Discover more from HMR Labs Subscribe now to keep reading and get access to the full archive. Continue reading Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us


 
https://hmrlabs.com/2023/07/26/unveiling-the-essential-role-of-finished-product-testing/
Unveiling the essential role of finished product testing - HMR labs Skip to content Herd Mundy Richardson Limited +44 (0) 161 406 6767 info@hmrlabs.com Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us Behind the Scenes: Unveiling the essential role of finished product testing Behind the Scenes: Unveiling the essential role of finished product testing elizabethtaylornetworkscientificcouk Uncategorized 26th July 2023 | 0 Pharmaceutical innovation is one of the main driving forces behind healthcare advances. Piloting new and enhanced treatments has accelerated public health to never-before-seen heights. From drug discovery and development to clinical research trials, each pharmaceutical product will undergo a substantial journey, with safety, efficacy and quality closely monitored throughout the process to confirm its continuation. As the last line of defense before a pharmaceutical can hit the shelf is finished product testing. This valuable stage ensures compliance with regulatory standards, performing the final safety and quality evaluations prior to determining whether a product can be released to the market. In this article, we explore the significance of finished product testing, including the testing methods employed to confirm the component safety of each drug product. The essential role of finished product testing Imagine that your doctor prescribed a brand-new medication that you’ve never taken before. In the world we live in today, we trust that this drug is not only safe for human consumption but will actively improve our health in one way or another. Nevertheless, the only way that a medicinal drug can be administered by consumers, is once it has been quality checked. Thanks to the stringent and rigorous controls within the pharmaceutical field, drug innovators can confidently produce quality medications that perform exactly as intended. Of course, that’s not to say that it’s always been that way. With pharmaceutical advancements speeding up dramatically throughout the past century, safety measures were somewhat of an afterthought up until 50 years ago. This left the public vulnerable to dangerous side effects and sometimes life-threatening repercussions. Through the development of strict regulatory frameworks and rigorous safety monitoring, 21 st century safety measures are far more advanced than those from 50 years ago. However, that doesn’t mean we’ve been completely immune to serious cases of product recall. Take the Heparin drug crisis in 2008, for example; a medication designed to treat and prevent blood clots which involved contamination of the finished product by a counterfeit ingredient. This situation led to a worldwide product recall due to a mass of life-threatening allergic reactions and fatalities. A scenario which undoubtedly raised concerns around the existing and seemingly outdated quality control measures. This case highlights exactly why pharmaceutical innovation must have rigorous safeguarding measures in place. Regulating medication with rigid and robust, routine assessments would ensure the safety of all consumers. This is where finished product testing comes into play: What is finished product testing? Finished product testing focuses solely on evaluating the physical and chemical components of pharmaceutical products prior to and after batch release. These tests provide a comprehensive and final assessment to ensure the product is safe, reliable, and meets its intended purpose. The analytical tests conducted assess all essential parameters, including identity, potency, purity, microbiological content and more. A range of testing methods validated in accordance with ICH guidelines are employed. These quality control testing methods are designed to ensure that each product is in conformance with the approved specifications and performs exactly as it should. Below, we delve into the common finished product analysis techniques and the specific parameters they assess: Identity, purity and potency assessments Critical to the effectiveness and safety of all medicines is a comprehensive assessment of the identity, potency and purity of the manufactured finished product. Included in the catalogue of analytical techniques used, are Liquid Chromatography (HPLC and UHPLC), Gas Chromatography (GC), Infrared and UV Spectrophotometry. Through the preparation and analysis of samples in the liquid phase, HPLC and UHPLC techniques can be used to separate out the complex mixtures that arise within finished drug products. Analysts can then detect and quantify each constituent individually; the active pharmaceutical ingredients (APIs) and excipients, other ingredients such as preservatives or flavourings, as well as the unwanted impurities and degradation products. The testing methods used to determine the potency or active content of a finished drug product may also be applied to individual tablets, capsules or any other pre-metered dosage form. This will confirm the content uniformity across a manufactured batch, ensuring that each and every dose of an active substance administered to patients is within accepted limits. In a similar way to the LC techniques, GC can be deployed for the analysis of drug product components in the gaseous phase. The determination of ethanol content is an important factor in assessing the formulation of a variety of medicinal products, such as cough syrups or some metered dose inhalers. GC analysis is particularly useful in determining whether potentially harmful volatile or semi-volatile leachables may be present within a drug product at levels either above the AET (analytical evaluation threshold) or SCT (safety concern threshold) after being in contact with the drug product primary packaging or container/closure system. To ensure complete discrimination of the identity of an active substance within a finished product, secondary orthogonal procedures are employed, these often include Infrared (IR) or Ultraviolet-Visible (UV-Vis) spectrophotometric tests which examine the precise absorption characteristics of the compound under test. Taken together, the identification tests ensure that the manufactured product contains only the exact active pharmaceutical ingredient as is described on the label. HMR labs offer a comprehensive range of validated testing services for the confirmed identity, purity and potency testing of your pharmaceutical products, APIs and excipients. Qualifying each sample before batch release is second nature to our dedicated team of experts, who have extensive experience in pharmaceutical testing. When does finished product testing occur? Finished product testing continues even after a pharmaceutical has been given the all clear for batch release. Ongoing analytical testing must be performed to monitor various batches of drugs in the market and ensure the component make up remains consistent even after it has hit the shelves. This process involves finished product testing that accounts for: Performance testing The effectiveness of a pharmaceutical drug product is not always simply based on its ingredients. Often the in-vivo performance of a medicine will also depend on additional factors. For example, the controlled release of an active ingredient from a tablet or capsule once ingested, the aerosolisation of an inhaled formulation for delivery to the nasal mucosa or the lungs, or the transdermal delivery of a drug from a patch or injector pen. Each of these drug product characteristics are assessed using in-vitro performance tests. Dissolution testing is a critical indicator of drug quality, assessing solubility and the intended therapeutic effects of the API. Several methods are employed to simulate drug release within the human body for a particular drug, and the choice of method depends on its ability to best replicate the physiological conditions of the intended site of drug release. Similarly for nasal and orally inhaled drug products, the amount of active pharmaceutical ingredient that reaches the site of absorption will depend on both the formulation as well as the design and operation of the chosen delivery device. Any variation in these can have a significant effect on both the emitted dose and aerodynamic particle size distribution of the aerosol when released from the inhalation device. Assessing both of these parameters is critical in ensuring that an inhaled product conforms to the established pharmacopeial specifications. HMR’s state-of-the-art facilities include a full range of qualified test equipment, with teams of analytical scientists dedicated to the performance testing of a wide range of pharmaceutical dosage forms. Interested in finding out more about our dissolution testing? Check out our previous article, you can find this here . Microbiological testing Microbiological testing is fundamental for the identification and detection of harmful bacteria and other microorganisms. It includes testing for microbial limits, preservative efficacy, bacterial endotoxins and more. Microbial limit testing aims to ensure that samples are free from unwanted bacteria, yeasts, and molds through assessment metrics such as the Total Viable Count (TVC) or Total Yeast and Mold Count (TYMC). Specific pathogen testing methods can also be employed, along with antimicrobial effectiveness and preservative efficacy testing to evaluate the ability of preservatives to inhibit microbial growth. Bioburden experiments are conducted to measure microbial contamination levels on or in a product. This is achieved using methods such as plate count or membrane filtration, which promote colony growth and help determine the initial number of microbes in a sample. Bacterial endotoxin testing is used to detect and quantify endotoxins. This is often achieved through Limulus Amoebocyte Lysate (LAL) which can detect both viable and non-viable Gram-negative bacteria. With 4 custom-built microbiology laboratories, our labs can provide confirmation and peace of mind surrounding microbial evaluation of all finished pharmaceutical dosage forms. Partner with HMR on your journey to batch release Finished product testing must be conducted with absolute precision, accuracy, and reliability. Given the complexity and stringent nature of the validated methods and their active role in safeguarding both pharmaceutical innovation and public health, choosing a testing provider is pivotal in drug development journeys. With over 35 years of analytical experience, HMR Labs have assisted countless innovators on their journey to the shelf. Our extensive experience in finished product testing, full range of instrumentation and custom-built facilities are designed to accommodate the diverse needs and requirements of finished product analysis. Looking to accelerate and maintain your batch release journey? Get in touch with our team today. Post navigation Previous: Previous post: The dissolution solution: meaningful drug development Next: Next post: Revolutionising respiratory health: inhalation drug product testing Leave a Reply Cancel reply HMR Labs © HMR Labs 2021 Testing Services Bespoke Projects Our Labs About Us News Contact Us Discover more from HMR Labs Subscribe now to keep reading and get access to the full archive. Continue reading Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us


 
https://hmrlabs.com/services/
Services - HMR Labs Skip to content Herd Mundy Richardson Limited +44 (0) 161
406 6767 info@hmrlabs.com Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished
Product Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation Bespoke
Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us Services HMR are
able to offer a comprehensive range of pharmaceutical testing services. Our
custom built laboratories include temperature and humidity controlled
environments and specialised lighting conditions to facilitate the testing of
light-sensitive products. FINISHED PRODUCT TESTING We perform routine finished
product testing for the release of products into various markets, in-process
and comparator testing. METHOD DEVELOPMENT & VALIDATION ﻿ Many years of
experience enable us to develop and validate analytical methods for all dose
forms to current ICH guidelines. STABILITY TESTING We are able to provide a
full ICH stability service from the preparation of protocols, management of
sample storage and pull points, compliant analysis to preparing reports and
trend tables. PHARMACEUTICAL TESTING HMR have extensive experience in
pharmacopoeial testing (Ph.Eur., BP, USP and JP) and have a range of
specialised glassware, equipment and fully trained analysts in order to offer
a comprehensive compendial testing service. INHALED PRODUCT TESTING We have a
vast range of state-of-the-art equipment and highly trained analysts to enable
the testing of a range of inhalation products such as metered dose inhalers
(MDIs), dry powder inhalers (DPIs), aqueous mist inhalers, nebuliser solutions
and suspensions and aerosols. MICROBIOLOGICAL TESTING A full range of
microbiological services are available, including microbial limits,
preservative efficacy, bacterial endotoxins (LAL), identification of
contaminants, bioburden experiments, environmental testing and evaluation of
disinfectants and biocides. Contact Us Contact us today to discuss your
specific test requirements directly with our team of analytical scientists.
HMR Labs © HMR Labs 2021 Testing Services Bespoke Projects Our Labs About Us
News Contact Us Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product
Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation Bespoke Projects
Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us


 
https://hmrlabs.com/2023/05/17/the-dissolution-solution-meaningful-drug-development/
The dissolution solution: meaningful drug development - HMR Labs Skip to content Herd Mundy Richardson Limited +44 (0) 161 406 6767 info@hmrlabs.com Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us The dissolution solution: meaningful drug development The dissolution solution: meaningful drug development elizabethtaylornetworkscientificcouk Uncategorized 17th May 2023 | 0 At the heart of pharmaceutical testing, is drug dissolution, a crucial stage in drug development. Dissolution testing is formulated to assess the drug release rate from a particular dosage form, evaluating the intrinsic ability of the drug to dissolve and absorb into the bloodstream. In other words, the dissolution profile obtained from testing helps assess the effectiveness of a drug for in-vivo performance. Although vital, dissolution testing doesn’t come without its challenges. In order to ensure sufficient drug development and quality control, it is crucial that this kind of pharmaceutical testing is completed in appropriate, accurate and optimal testing conditions. The fundamentals of dissolution testing Dissolution testing is critical for the overall analysis of drug performance, whether it be solid, semisolid or liquid dosage forms. This testing is an obligatory step included within various phases of drug development, to ensure product optimisation at the early stages of R&D, or to perform stability assessment, evaluating formulation changes over time. Regardless of where dissolution testing is during a drug evaluation cycle, it is used to qualify the drugs optimum performance ability. This pivotal, i n-vitro ​ assessment, is designed to simulate in-vivo ​ conditions accurately. This is why several conditional factors must be evaluated to formulate an appropriate testing method, including apparatus type, media and agitation rate. From an FDA perspective , dissolution methods must also meet rigorous safety and quality regulations in order for a drug to be qualified for its introduction to the public. Given both its unnegotiable importance and the attention to detail that’s required for accurate testing, the process has become heavily reliant on purpose-built environments within a cGMP compliant facility. The testing process is now highly technique-dependent, with specialised skills and techniques required as a standardised procedure. Dissolution testing conditions To assess the dissolution profile of a drug and subsequently, it’s in-vivo performance, a discriminatory method must be formulated that’s sensitive to all variables that could affect the dissolution rate. Here, an evaluation of how the APIs (active pharmaceutical ingredients) release over time are assessed to monitor how they’re absorbed into the circulatory system. Various pharmacopoeias offer a definitive procedural outline for dissolution testing. External factors, including the apparatus used, proposed processes, dissolution media, and appropriate evaluations, can all have an effect on the results. This also transcends to small factors including the paddle rotation speed and sink conditions. Consequentially, it is vital that all variables are controlled and specified during the analytical method to ensure accuracy and reliability. Dissolution apparatus There are 4 types of dissolution apparatus defined in the United States Pharmacopeia (USP); basket type (1), paddle type (2), reciprocating cylinder (3) and flow-through cell (4). The apparatus used is dependent on the dosage form being tested, with the most common methods of dissolution testing being USP Apparatus 1 and 2 which is mainly used for oral, solid dosage forms. Although most commonly used, it still holds some disadvantages, one example being its inability to easily imitate gastrointestinal transit. Using a reciprocating cylinder (Apparatus 3) provides a more accurate in vitro-in vivo correlation. Given that the evaluation of each apparatus is a necessary step in defining the right testing method, outsourcing your testing to a pharmaceutical testing facility can ensure that the right apparatus is used during method development. HMR ’s headquarters host 15 expansive labs catered to various pharmaceutical tests. Our experienced team of scientists, with over 30 years’ experience, are comfortably familiar with each apparatus, ensuring dissolution with different mediums at different speeds and volumes. Allowing for flexible in-vitro vivo modelling and other drug requirements. Dissolution Media Expertise is important in selecting the appropriate dissolution media, which depends on various factors. These factors include the purpose of the test, the APIs solubility, and the type of dosage form, i.e. immediate-release or modified-release. Ideally, the dissolution media should also meet sink conditions. Methodology development With the pharmaceutical market competitiveness growing, and with the inherent race to the shelf, it’s imperative for dissolution testing to be performed with high efficiency. Failure can be both a costly and timely consequence, which inevitably slows down the drug development process. As a result, the need for optimal procedure and methodology should be of utmost importance. This can be ensured through: Highly trained specialists Good quality dissolution chemists are important, as a level of high observance and excellent time management skills are necessary. Full anticipation of expected variations, and having a thorough understanding of the method, its properties and rigidness mean that experienced, highly trained professionals are best equipped for dissolution testing. Chemists must have confident ability to determine any source of error that may occur, accurately proving that failure was directly determined by the dosage form. Chemists must clarify and minimise any aspects that could affect the dissolution rate, including coning, tablet-sticking, or air bubbles. All of which must be examined to assess any correlation with the dissolution rate. Both analyst error or a poorly validated method could lead to failure during dissolution testing, highlighting the importance of collaboration with highly trained specialists with direct product knowledge, experience of apparatus and all appropriate dissolution methods. HMR are an end-to-end provider with a highly experienced team and a comprehensive service range . From raw material testing, to finish product assessment, HMR works alongside you to fulfil your analytical testing needs throughout each step of your drug manufacturing journey. Optimal environment The initial apparatus quality, maintenance, calibration and overall care are imperative for optimal performance in dissolution testing. The operational ability must be at 100% before testing, as this can affect the dissolution rate and performance results. For example, vibration is a well-documented factor that can affect dissolution rates , and must be considered within the testing environment. Both system and environmental vibration can affect dissolution rate. With high vibration levels able to generate a false passing result, even heavy foot traffic or nearby equipment must be controlled. To minimise system vibration, it’s vital that the dissolution apparatus remains calibrated and well-maintained. Consequently, a separate laboratory devoted to dissolution testing will better avoid equipment problems stemming from vibration and other related issues. Utilizing a third-party testing provider is an ideal route to access a lab area dedicated to dissolution, ensuring testing avoids outside variables that affect results. HMR’s dissolution lab with state-of-the-art instrumentation includes a full range of dissolution apparatus, able to fulfil all dissolution testing requirements. HMR are the dissolution solution Given the vast complexity and systematic testing needed for drug development, harboring a more streamlined, efficient and flexible approach process is valuable to many on their journey towards batch release. Using an experienced testing provider that can qualify both method development and validation before assessing drug performance is highly advantageous in helping to achieve your goal. Given the longevity of the drug development life cycle, fostering a long-term partnership with a provider that can fulfil all of your pharmaceutical testing requirements within highly flexible timescales can further generate a streamlined drug development process. Helping you to achieve your results at a faster rate. The best way to ensure the crucial testing conditions needed for dissolution procedures is by utilising HMR. Get in touch to find out how we can assist you today. Post navigation Previous: Previous post: The benefits of outsourcing your pharmaceutical testing requirements Next: Next post: Behind the Scenes: Unveiling the essential role of finished product testing Leave a Reply Cancel reply HMR Labs © HMR Labs 2021 Testing Services Bespoke Projects Our Labs About Us News Contact Us Discover more from HMR Labs Subscribe now to keep reading and get access to the full archive. Continue reading Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us


 
https://hmrlabs.com/2023/05/03/the-benefits-to-outsourcing-your-pharmaceutical-testing-requirements/
The benefits of outsourcing your pharmaceutical testing needs Skip to content Herd Mundy Richardson Limited +44 (0) 161 406 6767 info@hmrlabs.com Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us The benefits of outsourcing your pharmaceutical testing requirements The benefits of outsourcing your pharmaceutical testing requirements elizabethtaylornetworkscientificcouk Uncategorized 3rd May 2023 | 0 Outsourcing analytical testing is an extremely attractive solution to the pharmaceutical and biotechnology industry. With the inherently competitive nature of the life science sector as a whole, companies are eager to come to market at a faster pace, meaning a continuous pressure for both drug development and subsequent testing requirements. Given the ever-increasing level of pharmaceutical analysis to be conducted before new, compliant, products hit the shelves, more and more companies are finding it difficult to perform extensive analytical testing in-house. Outsourcing to a third-party provider is often chosen as a cost-effective solution to pharmaceutical testing, with the increasing complexity of regularity demands as another key motivator for the shift from in-house testing to outsourcing. It has become an increasingly attractive business decision, and is responsible for the pharmaceutical outsourcing market’s dramatic growth, with the global pharmaceutical analytics testing market boasting a predicted CAGR of 8.5% over the next decade. Based on our extensive market knowledge, here’s why outsourcing to a third-party specialist is an attractive choice for pharmaceutical companies: A cost-effective solution Both the complexity and strict protocol adherence of pharmaceutical testing means in order to conduct testing in-house, you will need to provide or have access to all the necessary resources and specialised capabilities. Most companies don’t initially have the specific expertise or in-house ability readily available, so the cost of employing a brand-new test facility will far outweigh the upfront cost of an outsourced testing provider. In simple terms, conducting testing requires businesses to account for recruitment costs and overhead expenses for required staff skillsets (such as Quality Managers and Analytical Chemists) along with any additional training costs they might need. Not only will businesses incur additional lease agreement costs for any testing workspaces, they must also be able to finance a full range of testing equipment. Unless you’re producing a large quantity of licensed products, financing the above doesn’t present as a sensible business decision and ultimately, risks the future of your business. Outsourcing means that you won’t need financial resources for in-house ability, freeing additional budget to drive further innovation and facilitate your business growth agenda. Test complexity Pharmaceutical testing in general is an inherently complex process with intrinsically lengthy areas. One such example is stability testing, which requires highly specialised environmental conditions. The very nature of stability testing is complex as it involves the assessment of how a particular drug can withstand environmental influencers, from temperature to humidity and light. Similar to all other areas of required pharmaceutical testing, the process of stability testing is time-consuming, requires dedicated specialists and is deemed impossible to conduct in-house without the right equipment. From our experience, this is one of the most commonly provided third-party tests with most companies recognizing the benefits of outsourcing stability testing. Utilising a highly specialised contract provider that can handle all your testing requirements will allow for an easier, seamless service process. HMR labs offers an all-in-one testing solution for complete product testing, from method development and validation to stability and finished product assessment, managing all your testing requirements with ease. Pure focus on business objectives Utilising industry experts allows the company to fully utilise their business resources. Here, you’re able to prioritise current business objectives, as opposed to focusing your resources on the challenges and demands of in-house pharmaceutical testing. The ability to focus solely on your business objectives gives your company a competitive edge over the market, optimising business performance that is purely focused on delivering further innovation. Regulation compliance With pharmaceutical testing comes compliance regulations. Your company must be GMP accredited and fully compliant with regulatory standards in order to conduct any part of pharmaceutical testing. To maintain compliance, your company will require regular approvals, which cannot be failed; it’s vital that if you are to conduct in-house testing that you also abide by compliance regulations, because your business reputation depends on it. With the simultaneous increase in regulatory documentation processes, it’s far simpler to outsource instead of completing it yourself. Overall, it is a complex and costly process to ensure your business is compliant with pharmaceutical testing regulations. This tends to become a drawback, especially for those companies with only a few licensed products. When outsourcing to analytical specialists, you can rest assured that compliance is guaranteed. Increased speed to market With so many product variations available in the healthcare market and taking into account that innovation is a key aspect of government investment , speed to market is usually a priority for many businesses. Utilising an experienced third-party contractor that is already approved is far more likely to produce faster results. Once samples are delivered, analysis can begin almost immediately, and is conducted through the use of a highly experienced team of specialists. Specialist testing means that you can take advantage of a knowledgeable, expert workforce and fully equipped labs. This also provides the opportunity to gain third-party insight into any challenges and how to overcome them. If speed to the marketplace is high on your business agenda, it’s also highly advantageous to work with a provider that not only produces results, but values a consultative, partnership approach. HMR services include a comprehensive range of pharmaceutical testing services, with their in-house expertise allowing for a collaborative approach to drug development, helping you achieve your results faster. The speed in which you can access such pharmaceutical testing services also has a greater impact on business development. You’ll have the opportunity to produce new innovations at a faster rate, as a third-party tester can manage various lengthy testing responsibilities, leaving your in-house team to focus on further product developments. Looking to outsource your test requirements? Providing a comprehensive range of pharmaceutical testing services, HMR is a leading provider in stability, microbiological, inhaled products, API testing and more. Our consultative approach and in-house capabilities allow us to work with our clients end-to-end, from method development and validation to finished product testing. Get in touch today. Post navigation Previous: Previous post: HMR Are Attending Making Pharmaceuticals 2021 Next: Next post: The dissolution solution: meaningful drug development Leave a Reply Cancel reply HMR Labs © HMR Labs 2021 Testing Services Bespoke Projects Our Labs About Us News Contact Us Discover more from HMR Labs Subscribe now to keep reading and get access to the full archive. Continue reading Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us


 
https://hmrlabs.com/2021/09/28/hmr-are-attending-making-pharmaceuticals-2021/
HMR Are Attending Making Pharmaceuticals 2021 - HMR Labs Skip to content Herd Mundy Richardson Limited +44 (0) 161 406 6767 info@hmrlabs.com Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us HMR Are Attending Making Pharmaceuticals 2021 HMR Are Attending Making Pharmaceuticals 2021 HMR Labs Conferences 28th September 2021 | 0 HMR are happy to announce that next week we will be attending the Making Pharmaceuticals Exhibition and Conference 2021 . HMR can be found at stand 131 in the Laboratory Zone. The Making Pharmaceuticals Exhibition and Conference 2021 is a two day event held at the Coventry Building Society Arena on the 5th and 6th of October. The event is free for all to attend, and brings together professionals involved in all aspects of the Pharmaceutical industry from the development of Raw Materials, to the manufacturing and testing of Pharmaceutical Products. As a Contract Research Organisation, HMR Labs will be available to talk to you about all your Pharmaceutical Testing requirements including Raw Material, Finished Product, Inhaled Product, Microbiological, Stability Testing and Method Development and Validation. We look forward to meeting you all on the day. In the meantime, please get in touch and we would be happy to discuss the services we provide. Post navigation Previous: Previous post: HMR’s New Website Design Has Now Gone Live! Next: Next post: The benefits of outsourcing your pharmaceutical testing requirements Leave a Reply Cancel reply HMR Labs © HMR Labs 2021 Testing Services Bespoke Projects Our Labs About Us News Contact Us Discover more from HMR Labs Subscribe now to keep reading and get access to the full archive. Continue reading Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us


 
https://hmrlabs.com/2021/05/21/new-website-design/
HMR's New Website Design Has Now Gone Live! - HMR Labs Skip to content Herd Mundy Richardson Limited +44 (0) 161 406 6767 info@hmrlabs.com Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us HMR’s New Website Design Has Now Gone Live! HMR’s New Website Design Has Now Gone Live! HMR Labs Business Update 21st May 2021 | 0 We are very excited to officially announce the launch of our new website design! You can find us at www.hmrlabs.com With the launch of HMR’s brand new website, our aim behind the redesign is to create a clean, interactive browsing experience for current and prospective clients. By improving the structure of our content, it has never been easier to find information on the pharmaceutical services provided by HMR Labs. We have also introduced some new content to the website, including real images of our dedicated, hard-working team members and a brand new ‘News’ page, where we will constantly be updating you with important company announcements, updates on what conferences we will be attending, as well as the latest information in the pharmaceutical industry. We invite you to connect with us on Twitter and Linkedin to stay up to date on our news. The new website design offers you a chance to discover the techniques HMR can offer you such as liquid and gas chromatography, inhaled product testing, as well as raw and finished product materials testing. Furthermore, HMR has extensive experience in pharmacopoeial testing (Ph.Eur., BP, USP and JP) and have a range of specialised glassware, equipment and fully trained analysts able to offer a comprehensive compendial testing service. Many years of experience enable us to develop and validate analytical methods for all dose forms to current ICH guidelines. Also, HMR can provide a full range of microbiological services, including microbial limits, preservative efficacy, bacterial endotoxins (LAL), identification of contaminants, bioburden experiments, environmental testing and evaluation of disinfectants and biocides. We are also able to provide a full ICH stability service from the preparation of protocols, management of sample storage and pull points, compliant analysis to preparing reports and trend tables. We hope you like the new website design and if you have any comments/feedback, please get in touch ! Post navigation Next: Next post: HMR Are Attending Making Pharmaceuticals 2021 Leave a Reply Cancel reply HMR Labs © HMR Labs 2021 Testing Services Bespoke Projects Our Labs About Us News Contact Us Discover more from HMR Labs Subscribe now to keep reading and get access to the full archive. Continue reading Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us


 
https://hmrlabs.com/author/elizabethtaylornetworkscientificcouk/
elizabethtaylornetworkscientificcouk, Author at HMR Labs Skip to content Herd
Mundy Richardson Limited +44 (0) 161 406 6767 info@hmrlabs.com Testing
Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient
Method Development and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation
About Us News Contact Us Author: elizabethtaylornetworkscientificcouk ICH
Stability Testing and appropriate validation of analytical procedures 8th
April 2024 Regardless of whether you’re at the pharmaceutical manufacturing
stage, the biotechnology research and development stage, or the drug discovery
lead generation stage of the drug candidate lifecycle, ICH guidelines play a
powerful role in guaranteeing the safety, efficacy and quality of those
candidates that make it to the shelves. As regulatory agencies work to
implement… Read more Revolutionising respiratory health: inhalation drug
product testing 11th September 2023 It’s estimated that around 545 million
individuals worldwide live with chronic respiratory conditions. Given its
prevalence, inhalation therapeutics are an integral focus within the R&D realm
to evolve treatments. With inhalation pharmaceutical developments comes a
comprehensive range of testing methods and tools, used to validate and qualify
each new product as safe and viable and… Read more Behind the Scenes:
Unveiling the essential role of finished product testing 26th July 2023
Pharmaceutical innovation is one of the main driving forces behind healthcare
advances. Piloting new and enhanced treatments has accelerated public health
to never-before-seen heights. From drug discovery and development to clinical
research trials, each pharmaceutical product will undergo a substantial
journey, with safety, efficacy and quality closely monitored throughout the
process to confirm its continuation.… Read more The dissolution solution:
meaningful drug development 17th May 2023 At the heart of pharmaceutical
testing, is drug dissolution, a crucial stage in drug development. Dissolution
testing is formulated to assess the drug release rate from a particular dosage
form, evaluating the intrinsic ability of the drug to dissolve and absorb into
the bloodstream. In other words, the dissolution profile obtained from testing
helps assess… Read more The benefits of outsourcing your pharmaceutical
testing requirements 3rd May 2023 Outsourcing analytical testing is an
extremely attractive solution to the pharmaceutical and biotechnology
industry. With the inherently competitive nature of the life science sector as
a whole, companies are eager to come to market at a faster pace, meaning a
continuous pressure for both drug development and subsequent testing
requirements. Given the ever-increasing level of… Read more HMR Labs © HMR
Labs 2021 Testing Services Bespoke Projects Our Labs About Us News Contact Us
Loading Comments... Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished
Product Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation Bespoke
Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us


 
https://hmrlabs.com/category/uncategorised/
Uncategorized Archives - HMR Labs Skip to content Herd Mundy Richardson
Limited +44 (0) 161 406 6767 info@hmrlabs.com Testing Services Stability
Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient Method Development
and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact
Us Category: Uncategorized ICH Stability Testing and appropriate validation of
analytical procedures 8th April 2024 Regardless of whether you’re at the
pharmaceutical manufacturing stage, the biotechnology research and development
stage, or the drug discovery lead generation stage of the drug candidate
lifecycle, ICH guidelines play a powerful role in guaranteeing the safety,
efficacy and quality of those candidates that make it to the shelves. As
regulatory agencies work to implement… Read more Revolutionising respiratory
health: inhalation drug product testing 11th September 2023 It’s estimated
that around 545 million individuals worldwide live with chronic respiratory
conditions. Given its prevalence, inhalation therapeutics are an integral
focus within the R&D realm to evolve treatments. With inhalation
pharmaceutical developments comes a comprehensive range of testing methods and
tools, used to validate and qualify each new product as safe and viable and…
Read more Behind the Scenes: Unveiling the essential role of finished product
testing 26th July 2023 Pharmaceutical innovation is one of the main driving
forces behind healthcare advances. Piloting new and enhanced treatments has
accelerated public health to never-before-seen heights. From drug discovery
and development to clinical research trials, each pharmaceutical product will
undergo a substantial journey, with safety, efficacy and quality closely
monitored throughout the process to confirm its continuation.… Read more The
dissolution solution: meaningful drug development 17th May 2023 At the heart
of pharmaceutical testing, is drug dissolution, a crucial stage in drug
development. Dissolution testing is formulated to assess the drug release rate
from a particular dosage form, evaluating the intrinsic ability of the drug to
dissolve and absorb into the bloodstream. In other words, the dissolution
profile obtained from testing helps assess… Read more The benefits of
outsourcing your pharmaceutical testing requirements 3rd May 2023 Outsourcing
analytical testing is an extremely attractive solution to the pharmaceutical
and biotechnology industry. With the inherently competitive nature of the life
science sector as a whole, companies are eager to come to market at a faster
pace, meaning a continuous pressure for both drug development and subsequent
testing requirements. Given the ever-increasing level of… Read more HMR Labs ©
HMR Labs 2021 Testing Services Bespoke Projects Our Labs About Us News Contact
Us Loading Comments... Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished
Product Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation Bespoke
Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us


 
https://hmrlabs.com/author/ashippen/
HMR Labs, Author at HMR Labs Skip to content Herd Mundy Richardson Limited +44
(0) 161 406 6767 info@hmrlabs.com Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product
Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation
Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us Author: HMR
Labs HMR Are Attending Making Pharmaceuticals 2021 28th September 2021 HMR are
happy to announce that next week we will be attending the Making
Pharmaceuticals Exhibition and Conference 2021. HMR can be found at stand 131
in the Laboratory Zone. The Making Pharmaceuticals Exhibition and Conference
2021 is a two day event held at the Coventry Building Society Arena on the 5th
and 6th of… Read more HMR’s New Website Design Has Now Gone Live! 21st May
2021 We are very excited to officially announce the launch of our new website
design! You can find us at www.hmrlabs.com With the launch of HMR’s brand new
website, our aim behind the redesign is to create a clean, interactive
browsing experience for current and prospective clients. By improving the
structure of our content, it has never… Read more HMR Labs © HMR Labs 2021
Testing Services Bespoke Projects Our Labs About Us News Contact Us Loading
Comments... Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product
Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation Bespoke Projects
Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us


 
https://hmrlabs.com/category/conferences/
Conferences Archives - HMR Labs Skip to content Herd Mundy Richardson Limited
+44 (0) 161 406 6767 info@hmrlabs.com Testing Services Stability Inhaled
Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and
Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us
Category: Conferences HMR Are Attending Making Pharmaceuticals 2021 28th
September 2021 HMR are happy to announce that next week we will be attending
the Making Pharmaceuticals Exhibition and Conference 2021. HMR can be found at
stand 131 in the Laboratory Zone. The Making Pharmaceuticals Exhibition and
Conference 2021 is a two day event held at the Coventry Building Society Arena
on the 5th and 6th of… Read more HMR Labs © HMR Labs 2021 Testing Services
Bespoke Projects Our Labs About Us News Contact Us Loading Comments... Testing
Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient
Method Development and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation
About Us News Contact Us


 
https://hmrlabs.com/category/business-update/
Business Update Archives - HMR Labs Skip to content Herd Mundy Richardson
Limited +44 (0) 161 406 6767 info@hmrlabs.com Testing Services Stability
Inhaled Product Finished Product Microbiological Ingredient Method Development
and Validation Bespoke Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact
Us Category: Business Update HMR’s New Website Design Has Now Gone Live! 21st
May 2021 We are very excited to officially announce the launch of our new
website design! You can find us at www.hmrlabs.com With the launch of HMR’s
brand new website, our aim behind the redesign is to create a clean,
interactive browsing experience for current and prospective clients. By
improving the structure of our content, it has never… Read more HMR Labs © HMR
Labs 2021 Testing Services Bespoke Projects Our Labs About Us News Contact Us
Loading Comments... Testing Services Stability Inhaled Product Finished
Product Microbiological Ingredient Method Development and Validation Bespoke
Projects Our Labs Instrumentation About Us News Contact Us

